Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Establishment of commission; membership.  (1) The Juvenile Justice  Policy
Commission is established within the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission to provide data-
driven policy recommendations to strengthen public safety and improve youth outcomes in
the juvenile justice system of this state.
(2) The Juvenile Justice  Policy Commission consists of 17 members who are appointed
as follows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint, subject to  confirmation by the Senate in the manner
prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565:
(A) One representative of the Oregon Youth Authority;
(B) One representative of the Department of Human Services;
(C) One representative of the Department of Education;
(D) Two directors of county juvenile departments;
(E) One representative of  the office of public defense services with experience in juvenile
delinquency, or that person’s designee;
(F) One representative of the Oregon District Attorneys Association with experience
prosecuting juvenile delinquency, or that person’s designee;
(G) One representative of a youth advocacy organization;
(H) One representative of a victim advocacy organization;
(I) One person who is a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe in this state, or
that person’s designee; and
(J) Two members  of the public, one member having experience with the juvenile justice
system as a youth  and one member having experience as the family member of a youth in
the juvenile justice system.
(b) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members of the  Senate, each member
being of a different political party, who shall be nonvoting members serving ex officio.
(c) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint two members of  the House
of Representatives, each member being of a different political party,  who shall be nonvoting
members serving ex officio.
(d) The Chief  Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint one representative of the Judi-
cial Department.
Enrolled House Bill 2320 (HB 2320-B) Page 1
(3) Members who are appointed to  the Juvenile Justice Policy Commission shall be ap-
pointed with consideration to geographical, racial, ethnic and gender diversity.
(4) The term of office of each member of  the Juvenile Justice Policy Commission other
than a legislative member is four years. The term of  office for a legislator who is appointed
ex officio under subsection (2) of section  is four years or the end of the legislator’s term,
whichever comes first. Before the expiration of the term of a  member, the appointing au-
thority shall appoint a successor whose  term begins immediately upon the expiration of the
term of the  current member. A member is eligible for reappointment, but may serve no more
than two consecutive terms. If there is a vacancy for  any cause, the appointing authority
shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term, which
shall not count toward the limitation of two consecutive terms under this subsection.
(5) A voting member of the Juvenile Justice Policy Commission who is not an employee
of the state is entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495. A voting
member of the commission  who is an employee of the state, other than a legislator member,
is not entitled to compensation, but may be reimbursed from  funds available to the com-
mission for actual and necessary travel and other expenses  incurred by the member in the
performance of the member’s official duties in the manner and amount provided in  ORS
292.495. Claims for compensation and expenses incurred in performing the functions  of the
commission shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the commission for that purpose.
(6) A legislative member of  the Juvenile Justice Policy Commission is entitled to payment
of compensation and  expenses under ORS 171.072 from funds appropriated to the Legislative
Assembly.
SECTION 2.
Initial terms.  Notwithstanding the term of office specified by section 1  of
this 2023 Act, of the  voting members first appointed to the Juvenile Justice Policy Commis-
sion:
(1) Three shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2025.
(2) Five shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2026.
(3) Five shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3.
Officers; quorum; meetings.  (1) The  Governor shall select one of the voting
members of the Juvenile  Justice Policy Commission as a chairperson who shall serve at the
pleasure of the Governor. The term of the  chairperson is one year. A person may be reap-
pointed as chairperson for no more than two consecutive years.
(2) The members of the commission shall select one of the voting members as  a vice
chairperson.
(3) A majority of the  members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(4) The commission shall meet at least four times per year at a  time and place deter-
mined by the commission. The commission also may  meet at other times and places specified
by the call of the chairperson or of a majority of the members of the commission.
(5) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall  provide staff support to the Juvenile
Justice Policy Commission.
SECTION 4. Duties. (1) The Juvenile Justice Policy  Commission shall analyze the juvenile
justice system at the state  and local levels and across branches of government in this state
to provide recommendations for  improvements in law, policy, practice and appropriation to
improve public safety, youth outcomes and system disparities.  In conducting its analysis the
commission shall oversee data-driven and qualitative analysis to examine:
(a) Key drivers of system involvement and opportunities for improved  diversion and
restorative justice;
(b) Drivers of detention and residential placement and any available  or needed alterna-
tives to detention and residential placement;
(c) Policies and practices of  assessment, court process, community supervision and re-
entry;
Enrolled House Bill 2320 (HB 2320-B) Page 2
(d) Service delivery for youth under system supervision, including  the provision of be-
havioral health, education, workforce development and  other needed services, with evalu-
ation of whether program and support resources  are used efficiently and whether
collaboration is efficient across service systems;
(e) Racial, ethnic and other forms of disparities  among youth impacted by the juvenile
justice system;
(f) Efficiency and effectiveness of state and county quality assurance, data collection and
reporting and oversight systems;
(g) Opportunities for better alignment  with constitutional mandates, local and national
best practices and research;
(h) Public safety within the context of personal responsibility,  accountability and refor-
mation; and
(i) Victim rights.
(2) Using the analysis described in subsection (1) of this  section, the Juvenile Justice
Policy Commission may:
(a) Recommend legislation, appropriations and administrative policies  and practices for
statewide adoption;
(b) Assess the impact of current legislation involving juvenile justice and related initi-
atives;
(c) Develop data-driven best practices,  guidance, training and materials for state agen-
cies, juvenile courts, county juvenile departments and practitioners; and
(d) Oversee state and  private funding for pilot projects, system innovations and other
initiatives through competitive selection processes.
(3) The Juvenile Justice Policy Commission shall provide a report to the Legislative  As-
sembly, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, by September 1st of every even-numbered
year.
(4) All agencies  of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
Juvenile Justice Policy Commission in the performance of its duties and, to the extent  per-
mitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish such information and advice  as the
members of the commission consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 5.
Initial report due.  The report described in section 4 (3) of this 2023 Act is
first due September 1, 2024, and September 1 of every even-numbered year thereafter.
SECTION 6. Appropriation. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,
there is appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $397,532, which  may be expended for
research, policy consultation and support for the Juvenile Justice Policy Commission.
SECTION 7.
Repeals. (1) Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
(2) Section 5 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 8.
Captions. The section captions used in this  2023 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2320 (HB 2320-B) Page 3
Passed by House June 7, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2320 (HB 2320-B) Page 4